src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
kustutuskumm+N:kustutus%#k˘umm TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kustutusvahend+N:kustutus%#vahend REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutiikula+N:kut˘iikula AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@kuts+N:@P.Stem.Single@k˘utʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsa+N:kutʲsa PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utsar REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
kutsealune+N:k˘utse%#alune SOOLANE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseharidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utse%#haridus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
kutsekaart+N:k˘utse%#k˘aart TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsekaaslane+N:k˘utse%#k˘aaslane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsekaaslus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utse%#k˘aaslus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsekas+N:kutseka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsekiri+N:k˘utse%#k˘irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsekool+N:k˘utse%#k˘oolʲ TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
kutseleht+N:k˘utse%#l˘ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseoskus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utse%#˘oskus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsetunnistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utse%#tunʲnistus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseõppeasutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utse%#˘õppe%#asutus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kutsikas+N:kutʲsika LOHAKAS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kutsu+N:kutʲsu PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
kutsumine+N:k˘utsumine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utsumus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsung+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kutsung REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsutu+N:kutsutu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
kutt+N:k˘utʲt TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utter%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@kuu+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@k˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 5 " ; 
kuub+N:k˘uuB1%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuubalane+N:kuubalane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuubalanna+N:kuubalanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuubik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuubik VIRSIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuuehõlm+N:kuue%#h˘õlm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuekäis+N:kuue%#k˘äis SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuendik+N:kˈuuend˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuguar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuguar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuketas+N:k˘uu%#k˘etT1a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuukiri+N:k˘uu%#k˘irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuul+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uulʲ TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
kuulaja+N:k˘uulaja AASTA  "weight: 7 " ; 
kuulajaskond+N:k˘uulajask˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuulamine+N:k˘uulamine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuular+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uular REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulataja+N:kuulataja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulatlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulatlus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulatlustoru+N:kuulatlus%#toru%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuld+N:k˘uulD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuldamatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuldavus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuldeklapp+N:k˘uulde%#kl˘app TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuldu+N:k˘uuldu AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuldus SUULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuule+N:k˘uulD1e PINGE  "weight: 9 " ; 
kuule+N:k˘uulE2 HAARE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulekus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulekus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuuletumine+N:kuuletumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuulijänn+N:kuulʲi%#j˘änʲn TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulike+N:kuulʲike PEENIKE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuulipilduja+N:kuulʲi%#p˘ilduja AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
kuulipildur+N:kuulʲi%#p˘ildur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuliprits+N:kuulʲi%#pr˘itʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulirahe+N:kuulʲi%#rahe PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulitõuge+N:kuulʲi%#t˘õuK2e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuulja+N:k˘uulja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuullaager+N:k˘uulʲ%#l˘aager%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulmatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uulmatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulmeluuke+N:k˘uulme%#l˘uu PÄIKE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulmine+N:k˘uulmine SUULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuulmismulje+N:k˘uulmis%#m˘ulʲje PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulnu+N:k˘uulnu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulo+N:kuulo PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulsulepea+N:k˘uulʲ%#sule%#p˘E6A6%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uulsus SUULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulsusetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uulsusetus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulujutt+N:kuulu%#j˘utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuulumine+N:k˘uulumine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuulutaja+N:kuulutaja AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuulutamine+N:kuulutamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulutus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuluvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuluvus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uum%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 6 " ; 
kuumamine+N:k˘uumamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumarabandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuma%#rabandus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuumaveeallikas+N:kuuma%#v˘ee%#alʲlika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuumendus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuumpress+N:k˘uum%#pr˘esʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uumus SUULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuumutamine+N:kuumutamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuumuti+N:kuumuti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuumutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuunar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uunar REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuup+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uup TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuupaiste+N:k˘uu%#p˘aiste PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuupaistetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uu%#p˘aistetus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuupalk+N:k˘uu%#p˘alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
kuupmeeter+N:k˘uup%#m˘eeter%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuupuhastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uu%#puhastus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuupäev+N:k˘uu%#p˘äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uur TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuure+N:k˘uurE2 HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuria+N:k˘uuria AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuurits+N:kuurits MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuurort+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uur˘ort TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
kuurortlinn+N:k˘uur˘ort%#l˘inn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuursaal+N:k˘uur%#s˘aalʲ TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusaastak+N:k˘uus%#˘aastak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusehekk+N:kuuse%#h˘ekk TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuuseke+N:kuuseke PEENIKE  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusekorgik+N:kuuse%#korgik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusemets+N:kuuse%#m˘ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuusenoorendik+N:kuuse%#nˈoorend˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuseokas+N:kuuse%#˘okK1a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuseoks+N:kuuse%#˘oks%>%{pl.i%} KAEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
kuusepuu+N:kuuse%#p˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuseriisikas+N:kuuse%#riisika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuuseseen+N:kuuse%#s˘een%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusetukk+N:kuuse%#t˘ukk%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusevaras+N:kuuse%#v˘arG1a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuusik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuusik VIRSIK  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuusirp+N:k˘uu%#s˘irp TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusissetulek+N:k˘uu%#s˘isse%#tulek VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuusk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uusK1%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 7 " ; 
kuuskant+N:k˘uus%#k˘anʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusmann+N:k˘uus%#m˘anʲn TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuusnurk+N:k˘uus%#n˘urk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uutʲ TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuutaja+N:k˘uutaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuutõbi+N:k˘uu%#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuvalgus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uu%#v˘algus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
kuva+N:kuva KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuvalda+N:kuvˈalda PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuvand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuvand REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuvar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuvar REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuväär+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuv˘äär TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuvöös+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuv˘öös TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kušett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuš˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
kvaasikristall+N:kvaasi%#krist˘alʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kvadraat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvadr˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kvadrant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvadr˘anʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
